Hawaii statutes.
PART
XIII. FEES, CHARGES, AND PENALTIES

§428-1301 Fees. (a) The following
fees shall be paid to the director upon the filing and issuance of records
under this chapter:

(1) Articles of organization, $100;

(2) Articles of amendment, $25;

(3) Restated articles of organization, $25;

(4) Articles of merger or conversion, $100;

(5) Statement of dissociation, $25;

(6) Articles of termination, $25;

(7) Application for reinstatement for
administratively terminated limited liability company, $25;

(8) Annual report, $25;

(9) Any other statement or document of a domestic or
foreign limited liability company, $25;

(10) Application for certificate of authority for
foreign limited liability company, $100;

(11) Application for cancellation of authority of foreign
limited liability company, $25;

(12) Reservation of name, $10;

(13) Good standing certificate, $5;

(14) Any other record not otherwise covered in this
part, $25;

(15) Certified copy of any record relating to a
limited liability company or foreign limited liability company, $10 for the
certificate and affixing the seal thereto;

(16) Special handling fee for review of any record
other than articles of merger or conversion, $25;

(17) Special handling fee for review of articles of
merger or conversion, $75;

(18) Special handling fee for certificate issued by
the director not otherwise covered by this section, $10 per certificate;

(19) Special handling fee for certification of record,
$10;

(20) Any service of notice, demand, or process upon
the director as agent for service of process of a limited liability company or
foreign limited liability company, $10, which amount may be recovered as
taxable costs by the party to the suit or action causing such service to be
made if such party prevails in the suit or action; and

(21) For filings relating to registered agents, the
fees established by section 425R-2.

(b) All fees collected under this section
shall be managed in accordance with section 26-9(l). [L 1996, c 92, pt of §1;
am L 1998, c 11, §23; am L 1999, c 129, §16 and c 280, §23; am L 2000, c 219,
§82; am L 2001, c 129, §103; am L 2004, c 116, §9 and c 117, §6; am L 2009, c
55, §59]

Previous
Vol08_Ch0401-0429
Next